Utah statutes.
41-1a-517.   Change of name -- New title.
(1)  If the name of any person who has made application for or obtained a
certificate of title is legally changed, the person shall surrender the
certificate and file an application for a new certificate of title.
(2)  The division upon receipt of the required fees shall issue a new
certificate of title.
